Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WABASHA; LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR MARKED TRUNK HIGHWAY 60 REALIGNMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $2,894,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to the city of Wabasha, Wabasha County, or both to predesign, design, engineer, and construct the local roads and city utility portions of the realignment of marked Trunk Highway 60 in the city of Wabasha, including associated sidewalks, sanitary sewer, water main, storm sewer, stormwater management, street lighting, site fill, and related improvements and betterments of a capital nature to increase pedestrian safety and develop workforce housing. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,894,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end